Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.580

Action on bond by director—Failure of depositor creditor to file claim upon request—Effect.

If a depositor creditor after notification fails, refuses, or neglects to file in the office of the director his or her verified claim against a warehouse operator or grain dealer bond as requested by the director within thirty days from the date of the request, the director shall thereupon be relieved of further duty or action under this chapter on behalf of the depositor creditor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 637; 1983 c 305 s 57; 1975 1st ex.s. c 7 s 30.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.